Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1045.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 17, 1959 (P.L.1913, No.694), known as the Equal Pay Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.1. Pay Ranges.--(a) An employer shall provide the pay range and the factors the employer considers in setting pay ranges to:(1) An applicant for a position offered in a job posting.(2) An employe who is a candidate for a position offered as an internal transfer or promotion.(b) If no pay range exists, an employer shall provide the minimum wage or salary set by the employer before the employer posted the position or offered an internal transfer or 12345678910111213141516171819 promotion.(c) Upon hiring an employe, and annually thereafter, an employer shall provide the employe, in writing, the pay range for the employe's job title and for jobs within the employer's business that are substantially similar with respect to the skill, effort and responsibility required to perform the jobs and the conditions under which the jobs are performed.(d) This section applies to employers with fifteen or more employes.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1045PN1255 - 2 - 12345678910